Washington statutes.
RCW 35.95.030

Appropriation of funds for transportation systems authorized—Referendum.

The corporate authorities of any municipality are authorized to appropriate general funds for the operation, maintenance, and capital needs of municipally owned or leased and municipally operated public transportation systems subject to the right of referendum as provided by statute or charter.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 111 s 3.]